California, session 20252026, AB1184.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Homeowner Association Accountability and Transparency Act of 2026.SEC. 2. Section 4360 of the Civil Code is amended to read:4360. (a) The board shall provide general notice pursuant to Section 4045 of a proposed rule change at least 28 days before making the rule change. The notice shall include the text of the proposed rule change and a description of the purpose and effect of the proposed rule change. Notice is not required under this subdivision if the board determines that an immediate rule change is necessary to address an imminent threat to public health or safety or imminent risk of substantial economic loss to the association.(b) A decision on a proposed rule change shall be made at a board meeting, after consideration of any comments made by association members.(c) As soon as possible after making a rule change, but not more than 15 days after making the rule change, the board shall deliver general notice pursuant to Section 4045 of the rule change. If the rule change was an emergency rule change made under subdivision (d), the notice shall include the text of the rule change, a description of the purpose and effect of the rule change, and the date that the rule change expires.(d) If the board determines that an immediate rule change is required to address an imminent threat to public health or safety, or an imminent risk of substantial economic loss to the association, it may make an emergency rule change, and no notice is required, as specified in subdivision (a). An emergency rule change is effective for 120 days, unless the rule change provides for a shorter effective period. A rule change made under this subdivision may not be readopted under this subdivision.(e) If an emergency rule change is made under subdivision (d), the general notice about the rule change shall include the text of the rule change, a description of the purpose and effect of the rule change, and the date when the rule change will expire.SEC. 3. Section 4910 of the Civil Code is amended to read:4910. (a) The board shall not take action on any item of business outside of a board meeting.(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 7211 of the Corporations Code, the board shall not conduct a meeting via a series of electronic transmissions, including, but not limited to, electronic mail, except as specified in paragraph (2).(2) Electronic transmissions may be used as a method of conducting an emergency board meeting if all directors, individually or collectively, consent in writing to that action, and if the written consent or consents are filed with the minutes of the board meeting. These written consents may be transmitted electronically.(c) A majority of the directors shall not, outside a meeting authorized by this article, use a series of communications to deliberate or act on any item of business within the authority of the board, except in an emergency. Informational or ministerial communications that do not solicit responses, do not involve discussion among a majority of directors, and do not result in board action are not prohibited by this subdivision.SEC. 4. Section 4921 is added to the Civil Code, to read:4921. (a) If an association becomes involved in litigation, the board shall provide notice of that occurrence as a part of the annual budget report distributed to members pursuant to Section 5300.(b) Any member receiving notice pursuant to subdivision (a) may request the name of the court and case number of any litigation.SEC. 5. Section 4935 of the Civil Code is amended to read:4935. (a) The board may adjourn to, or meet solely in, executive session to consider litigation, matters relating to the formation of contracts with third parties, member discipline, personnel matters, or to meet with a member, upon the member’s request, regarding the member’s payment of assessments, as specified in Section 5665.(b) The board shall adjourn to, or meet solely in, executive session to discuss member discipline, if requested by the member who is the subject of the discussion. That member shall be entitled to attend the executive session.(c) The board shall adjourn to, or meet solely in, executive session to discuss a payment plan pursuant to Section 5665.(d) The board shall adjourn to, or meet solely in, executive session to decide whether to foreclose on a lien pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5705.(e) Any matter discussed in executive session shall be generally noted in the minutes of the immediately following meeting that is open to the entire membership. Discussions regarding ongoing litigation shall have the case name included as part of the executive session meeting minutes.SEC. 6. Section 4941 is added to the Civil Code, to read:4941. (a) If open session meetings of the board are electronically recorded using audio, or audio and video, the recordings shall be considered a record of the association, and shall be made available to members on the same basis as written meeting minutes.(b) Notice shall be given at the beginning of every open session of the board that the meeting is being recorded.SEC. 7. Section 4950 of the Civil Code is amended to read:4950. (a) The minutes, minutes proposed for adoption that are marked to indicate draft status, or a summary of the minutes, of any board meeting, other than an executive session, shall be available to members within 30 days of the meeting. The minutes, proposed minutes, or summary minutes shall be distributed to any member upon request and upon reimbursement of the association’s costs for making that distribution. There shall be no charge for minutes that are distributed electronically. Posting the minutes on the association’s website satisfies this requirement, and members may shall be directed to the association’s website to obtain a copy.(b) The minutes, or proposed minutes, shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1) The date of the meeting.(2) The time of the meeting.(3) The location of the meeting.(4) The type of meeting, including, but not limited to, regular, special, emergency, executive, or committee.(5) Whether notice and an agenda of the meeting was given to the membership.(6) The names of the directors present.(7) The names of absent directors.(8) Whether members are also present, and names and titles of any guest speakers.(c) The annual policy statement, prepared pursuant to Section 5310, shall inform the members of their right to obtain copies of board meeting minutes and of how and where to do so.SEC. 8. Section 5100 of the Civil Code is amended to read:5100. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law or provision of the governing documents, elections regarding assessments legally requiring a vote, election and removal of directors, amendments to the governing documents, or the grant of exclusive use of common area pursuant to Section 4600 shall be held by secret ballot in accordance with the procedures set forth in this article.(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to an amendment of the operating rules.(3) An association shall hold an election for a seat on the board of directors in accordance with the procedures set forth in this article at the expiration of the corresponding director’s term and at least once every four years.(b) This article also governs an election on any topic that is expressly identified in the operating rules as being governed by this article.(c) The provisions of this article apply to both incorporated and unincorporated associations, notwithstanding any contrary provision of the governing documents.(d) The procedures set forth in this article shall apply to votes cast directly by the membership, but do not apply to votes cast by delegates or other elected representatives.(e) In the event of a conflict between this article and the provisions of the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law (Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) relating to elections, the provisions of this article shall prevail.(f) Directors shall not be required to be elected pursuant to this article if the governing documents provide that one member from each separate interest is a director.SEC. 9. Section 5120 of the Civil Code is amended to read:5120. (a) All votes shall be counted and tabulated by the inspector or inspectors of elections, or the designee of the inspector or inspectors of elections, in public at a properly noticed open meeting of the board or members. Any candidate or other member of the association may witness the counting and tabulation of the votes. A person, including a member of the association or an employee of the management company, shall not open or otherwise review any ballot before the time and place at which the ballots are counted and tabulated. The inspector or inspectors of elections, or the designee of the inspector or inspectors of elections, may verify the member’s information and signature on the outer envelope prior to the meeting at which ballots are tabulated. Once a secret ballot is received by the inspector or inspectors of elections, it shall be irrevocable.(b) The tabulated results of the election shall be promptly reported to the board and shall be recorded in the minutes of the next meeting of the board and shall be available for review by members of the association. For the election results for director positions, the meeting minutes shall state the term for each elected director.(c) Within 15 days of the election, the association shall give general notice pursuant to Section 4045 of the tabulated results of the election.(d) A person, including a member of the association or an employee of the management company, shall not open or otherwise review any tally sheet of votes cast by electronic secret ballots before the time and place at which the ballots are counted and tabulated.SEC. 10. Section 5205 of the Civil Code is amended to read:5205. (a) The association shall make available association records for the time periods and within the timeframes provided in Section 5210 for inspection and copying by a member of the association, or the member’s designated representative.(b) A member of the association may designate another person to inspect and copy the specified association records on the member’s behalf. The member shall make this designation in writing.(c) The association shall make the specified association records available for inspection and copying in the association’s business office within the common interest development.(d) If the association does not have a business office within the development, the association shall make the specified association records available for inspection and copying at a place agreed to by the requesting member and the association.(e) If the association and the requesting member cannot agree upon a place for inspection and copying pursuant to subdivision (d) or if the requesting member submits a written request directly to the association for copies of specifically identified records, the association may satisfy the requirement to make the association records available for inspection and copying by delivering copies of the specifically identified records to the member by individual delivery pursuant to Section 4040 within the timeframes set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 5210.(f) The association may bill the requesting member only for the direct and actual cost of copying and mailing requested documents. The association shall inform the member of the amount of the copying and mailing costs, and the member shall agree to pay those costs, before copying and sending the requested documents. There shall be no charge for the emailing of documents already in electronic format and that do not require any redacting.(g) In addition to the direct and actual costs of copying and mailing documents, the association may bill the requesting member an amount not in excess of ten dollars ($10) per hour, and not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) total per written request, for the time actually and reasonably involved in redacting an enhanced association record. If the enhanced association record includes a reimbursement request, the person submitting the reimbursement request shall be solely responsible for removing all personal identification information from the request. The association shall inform the member of the estimated costs, and the member shall agree to pay those costs, before retrieving the requested documents.(h) Requesting parties shall have the option of receiving specifically identified records by electronic transmission or machine-readable storage media as long as those records can be transmitted in a redacted format that does not allow the records to be altered. The cost of duplication shall be limited to the direct cost of producing the copy of a record in that electronic format. The association may deliver specifically identified records by electronic transmission or machine-readable storage media as long as those records can be transmitted in a redacted format that prevents the records from being altered.SEC. 11. Section 5235 of the Civil Code is amended to read:5235. (a) A member of an association may bring a civil action to enforce that member’s right to inspect and copy the association records. If a court finds that the association unreasonably withheld access to the association records, the court shall award the member reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs, and the court may impose a civil penalty of up to five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation.(b) A cause of action under this section may be brought in small claims court if the amount of the demand does not exceed the jurisdiction of that court.(c) A prevailing association may recover any costs if the court finds the action to be frivolous, unreasonable, or without foundation.